Georgia statutes. TITLE 53 Wills, Trusts, and Administration of Estates
Article 5 Foreign and Out-of-state Wills; Nondomiciliaries

Law reviews.

For article, “Foreign Wills in Georgia,” see 14 Ga. B.J. 410 (1952).

For article, “Probate and Administration of Small Estates in Georgia: Some Proposals for Reform,” see 6 Ga. L. Rev. 74 (1971).

For article, “The Probate and Establishment of Domestic and Foreign Wills: An Analysis of Statutory Requirements,” see 13 Ga. L. Rev. 133 (1978).